Mississippi, session 2026, SB2009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  An elected official's qualification as a candidate for a public office shall be deemed a resignation and vacancy of the official's current office if the term of the public office that is sought begins during the term for which the elected official currently serves.  Any vacancy created under this section shall be filled as provided by law for that office. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.